California statutes. Vehicle Code
(c) Any person convicted under subdivision (a) or (b) shall, if the violation proximately causes one or more adverse environmental impacts, also be liable in civil damages for the cost of mitigation, restoration, or repair thereof, in addition to any other liability imposed by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1322, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Littering and Environmental Protection [38319. - 38321.]

38319.

No person shall operate, nor shall an owner permit the operation of, an off-highway motor vehicle in a manner likely to cause malicious or unnecessary damage to the land, wildlife, wildlife habitat or vegetative resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38320.

(a) No person shall throw or deposit, nor shall the registered owner or the driver, if such owner is not then present in the vehicle, aid or abet in the throwing or depositing, upon any area, public or private, any bottle, can, garbage, glass, nail, offal, paper, wire, any substance likely to injure or kill wild or domestic animal or plant life or damage traffic using such area, or any noisome, nauseous or offensive matter of any kind.

(b) No person shall place, deposit or dump, or cause to be placed, deposited or dumped, any rocks or dirt
 in or upon any area, public or private, without the consent of the property owner or public agency having jurisdiction over the area.

(c) Any person who violates this section shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50). No part of such fine shall be suspended. The court may permit the fine required by this section to be paid in installments if the court determines that the defendant is unable to pay the fine in one lump sum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 399.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

38321.

(a) Any person who drops, dumps, deposits, places, or throws, or causes or permits to be dropped, dumped, deposited, placed, or thrown, upon any area, any material described in Section 38320, shall immediately remove the material or cause it to be removed.

(b) If such person fails to comply with the provisions of this section, the governmental agency responsible for the maintenance of the area, or the property owner of the land on which the material has been deposited, may remove such material and collect, by civil action, if necessary, the actual cost of the removal operation in addition
 to any other damages authorized by law from the person who did not comply with the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Equipment of Off-Highway Vehicles [38325. - 38397.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [38325. - 38330.]

38325.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all off-highway motor vehicles, as defined in Section 38006, when operated in areas in which this division has application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38330.

It is unlawful to operate any vehicle or combination of vehicles which is in an unsafe condition, which is not equipped as required by this chapter or the equipment regulations of the governmental agency having jurisdiction over public lands, or which is not safely loaded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Lighting Equipment [38335. - 38346.]

38335.

When operated from one-half hour after sunset to one-half hour before sunrise, each motor vehicle shall be equipped with at least one lighted white headlamp directed toward the front of the vehicle. Such lamp shall be of an intensity sufficient to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least 200 feet.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38345.

When operated from one-half hour after sunset to one-half hour before sunrise, each motor vehicle which is not in combination with any other vehicle shall be equipped with at least one lighted red taillamp which shall be clearly visible from the rear.

(a) Every such vehicle or vehicles at the end of a combination of vehicles shall be equipped with one lighted red taillamp when operated from one-half hour after sunset to one-half hour before sunrise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38346.

A person shall not display a flashing or steady burning red or blue warning light on an off-highway motor vehicle except as permitted by Section 21055 or when an extreme hazard exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 908, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Brakes [38355. - 38355.]

38355.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), every motor vehicle shall be equipped with a service brake system which is in good working order and adequate to control the movement of, and to stop and hold to the limit of traction of, such vehicle or combination of vehicles under all conditions of loading and upon any grade on which it is operated.

(b) Any motor vehicle, such as an air-cushioned vehicle, which is unable to comply with the requirements of this section due to the method of operation, is exempt, if the operator is able to exercise safe control over the movement of such
 vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Equipment [38365. - 38380.]

38365.

(a) Every off-highway motor vehicle, as defined in Section 38006, shall at all times be equipped with an adequate muffler in constant operation and properly maintained so as to meet the requirements of Section 38370, and no muffler or exhaust system shall be equipped with a cutout, bypass, or similar device. 

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) shall not be applicable to vehicles being operated off the highways in an organized racing or competitive event upon a closed course or in a hill climb or drag race, which is conducted under the auspices of a recognized sanctioning body or by
 permit issued by the local governmental authority having jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38366.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4442 of the Public Resources Code, and except for vehicles with mufflers as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 27150) of Chapter 5 of Division 12, no person shall use, operate, or allow to be used or operated, any off-highway motor vehicle, as defined in Section 38006, on any forest-covered land, brush-covered land, or grass-covered land unless the vehicle is equipped with a spark arrester maintained in effective working order.

(b) A spark arrester affixed to the exhaust system of a vehicle subject to this section shall not be
 placed or mounted in such a manner as to allow flames or heat from the exhaust system to ignite any flammable material.

(c) A spark arrester is a device constructed of nonflammable materials specifically for the purpose of removing and retaining carbon and other flammable particles over 0.0232 of an inch in size from the exhaust flow of an internal combustion engine or which is qualified and rated by the United States Forest Service. 

(d) Subdivision (a) shall not be applicable to vehicles being operated off the highway in an organized racing or competitive event upon a closed course, which is conducted under the auspices of a recognized sanctioning body and by permit issued by the fire protection authority having jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1027, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

38370.

(a) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall not identify any new off-highway motor vehicle, which is subject to identification and which produces a maximum noise level that exceeds the following noise limit, at a distance of 50 feet from the centerline of travel, under test procedures established by the Department of the California Highway Patrol. (1)Any such vehicle manufactured before January 1, 1973 92dBA(2)Any such vehicle manufactured on or after January 1, 1973, and before January 1, 1975 88dBA(3)Any such vehicle manufactured on or after January 1, 1975, and before January 1, 1986 86dBA(4)Any such vehicle manufactured on or after January1, 1986 82dBA(b) The department may accept a dealer’s certificate as proof of compliance with this section.

(c) Test procedures for compliance with this section shall be established by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, taking into consideration the test procedures of the Society of Automotive Engineers.

(d) No person shall sell or offer for sale any new off-highway motor vehicle which is subject to identification and which produces a maximum noise
 level that exceeds the noise limits in subdivision (a), and for which noise emission standards or regulations have not been adopted by the Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the Federal Noise Control Act of 1972 (P.L. 92-574).

(e) No person shall sell or offer for sale any new off-highway motor vehicle which is subject to identification and which produces a noise level that exceeds, or in any way violates, the noise emission standards or regulations adopted for such a motor vehicle by the Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the Federal Noise Control Act of 1972 (P.L. 92-574).

(f) As used in this section, the term “identify” is equivalent to the term “licensing” as used in Section 6(e)(2) of the Federal Noise Control Act of 1972 (P.L. 92-574).

(g) Any
 off-highway motor vehicle, when operating pursuant to Section 38001, shall at all times be equipped with a silencer, or other device, which limits noise emissions to not more than 101 dBA if manufactured on or after January 1, 1975, or 105 dBA if manufactured before January 1, 1975, when measured from a distance of 20 inches using test procedures established by the Society of Automotive Engineers under Standard J-1287. This subdivision shall only be operative until January 1, 2003.

(h) On and after January 1, 2003, off-highway motor vehicles, when operating pursuant to Section 38001, shall at all times be equipped with a silencer, or other device, which limits noise emissions.

(1) Noise emissions of competition off-highway vehicles manufactured on or after January 1, 1998, shall be limited to not more than 96 dBA, and if manufactured prior to January 1, 1998, to not more than 101
 dBA, when measured from a distance of 20 inches using test procedures established by the Society of Automotive Engineers under Standard J-1287, as applicable. Noise emissions of all other off-highway vehicles shall be limited to not more than 96 dBA if manufactured on or after January 1, 1986, and not more than 101 dBA if manufactured prior to January 1, 1986, when measured from a distance of 20 inches using test procedures established by the Society of Automotive Engineers under Standard J-1287, as applicable.

(2) The Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Recreation Division of the Department of Parks and Recreation shall evaluate and reassess the dates specified in paragraph (1) and include the findings and recommendations in the noise report required in subdivision (o) of Section 5090.32 of the Public Resources Code.

(i) Off-highway vehicle manufacturers or their agents prior to the sale
 to the general public in California of any new off-highway vehicle model manufactured after January 1, 2003, shall provide to the Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Recreation Division of the California Department of Parks and Recreation rpm data needed to conduct the J-1287 test, where applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 908, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

38375.

(a) An off-highway motor vehicle, except an authorized emergency vehicle, shall not be equipped with a siren.

(b) A person driving an off-highway motor vehicle, except the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle as permitted by Section 21055, shall not use a siren.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 908, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

38380.

(a) Because of specialized conditions such as fire hazard, public safety or other circumstances, any local authority, or state or federal agencies having control over public lands may require that vehicles being operated off highway be equipped with additional equipment.

(b) When such additional equipment is required in a specific location, the governmental agency having jurisdiction over that location shall insure that such regulations are posted in a manner that operators of off-highway motor vehicles using those locations will be aware of the special requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Emission Control Equipment [38390. - 38397.]

38390.

No person shall operate or maintain in a condition of readiness for operation any off-highway motor vehicle which is required to be equipped with a motor vehicle pollution control device under Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code or with any other certified motor vehicle pollution control device required by any other state law or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to such law, or required to be equipped with a motor vehicle pollution control device pursuant to the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. 1857 et seq.) and the standards and regulations promulgated thereunder, unless it is equipped with the required motor vehicle pollution
 control device which is correctly installed and in operating condition. No person shall disconnect, modify, or alter any such required device. Notwithstanding Section 43107 of the Health and Safety Code, this section shall apply only to off-highway motor vehicles of the 1978 or later model year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38391.

No person shall install, sell, offer for sale, or advertise any device, apparatus, or mechanism intended for use with, or as a part of, any required off-highway motor vehicle pollution control device or system which alters or modifies the original design or performance of any such motor vehicle pollution control device or system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38392.

When the court finds that a person has willfully violated any provision of this article, such person shall be fined the maximum amount that may be imposed for such an offense, and no part of the fine may be suspended.

“Willfully”, as used in this section, has the same meaning as the meaning of that word prescribed in Section 7 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38393.

No person shall operate an off-highway motor vehicle after notice by a traffic officer or other authorized public officer that such vehicle is not equipped with the required certified motor vehicle pollution control device correctly installed in operating condition, except as may be necessary to return the vehicle to the residence or place of business of the owner or driver or to a garage, until the vehicle has been properly equipped with such a device.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38394.

The notice to appear issued or complaint filed for a violation of any provision of this article shall require that the person to whom the notice to appear is issued or against whom the complaint is filed produce proof of correction pursuant to Section 40150.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38395.

This article shall not apply to an alteration, modification, or modifying device, apparatus, or mechanism found by resolution of the State Air Resources Board either:

(a) To not reduce the effectiveness of any required off-highway motor vehicle pollution control device; or

(b) To result in emissions from any such modified or altered off-highway vehicle which are at levels which comply with existing state or federal standards for that model year of the vehicle being modified or converted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38396.

The provisions of this article apply to off-highway motor vehicles of the United States or its agencies, to the extent authorized by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38397.

Except as provided in Section 38390, this article shall be applicable to all off-highway motor vehicles, whether or not subject to identification pursuant to this division and without limitation by the exceptions contained in Section 38001, and to all off-highway motor vehicles operated or maintained in a condition of readiness for operation on private or public property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. All-Terrain Vehicles [38500. - 38506.]

38500.

The Off-Highway Vehicle Safety Education Committee is hereby established. The committee consists of the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol, the Deputy Director of Parks and Recreation for Off-Highway Vehicles, the Director of Motor Vehicles, or their designees, and a member of the Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Recreation Commission appointed by the members of the commission. The committee shall receive staff assistance in its operations from the Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Recreation Division in the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

38500.1.

The Off-Highway Vehicle Safety Education Committee shall meet periodically to perform all of the following:

(a) Develop minimum criteria for certification as an approved all-terrain vehicle safety training organization. The criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Curriculum and materials for training instructors to teach all-terrain vehicle operation and safety.

(2) Curriculum and materials for training all-terrain vehicle safety.

(3) Curriculum for teaching responsible use of off-highway vehicles with respect to environmental considerations, private property restrictions, off-highway vehicle operating laws, including noise and spark arrestor laws, and prohibitions against operating off-highway vehicles under the influence of alcohol or drugs. 

(4) Record keeping and insurance requirements to satisfy the requirements of Sections 11103.1 and 11108.

(b) Upon presentation to the committee of a proposed program by an applicant to become an approved all-terrain vehicle safety training organization, the committee shall determine whether the applicant’s program meets the minimum criteria and, if approved, shall recommend the organization for licensing pursuant to Section 11105.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

38501.

(a) An all-terrain vehicle safety training organization, commencing on January 1, 1989, shall issue an all-terrain vehicle safety certificate furnished by the department to any individual who successfully completes a course of instruction in all-terrain vehicle operation and safety as approved and certified by the Off-highway Vehicle Safety Education Committee.

(b) The department shall charge a fee not to exceed three dollars ($3) for each all-terrain vehicle safety certificate issued by an all-terrain vehicle safety training organization to each person completing a
 course of instruction from an all-terrain vehicle safety instructor using the approved course of instruction of the all-terrain vehicle safety training organization. The amount of the fee shall be determined by the department and shall be sufficient to defray the actual costs incurred by the department for administering and monitoring this program.

(c) An all-terrain vehicle safety training organization shall not charge a fee in excess of the fee charged by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) for furnishing an all-terrain vehicle safety certificate. An organization may charge a fee not to exceed three dollars ($3) in addition to the fee charged by the department for the issuance of a duplicate certificate and shall provide a duplicate certificate if requested by the person who completed the course.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

38502.

The department, on and after July 1, 1988, may monitor any all-terrain vehicle safety training organization or any all-terrain vehicle safety instructor without advance notice. The monitoring may include, but is not limited to, the instruction provided, business practices, and records required by Section 11108.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

38503.

No person under the age of 18 years, on and after January 1, 1990, shall operate an all-terrain vehicle on public lands of this state unless the person satisfies one of the following conditions:

(a) The person is taking a prescribed safety training course under the direct supervision of a certified all-terrain vehicle safety instructor.

(b) The person is under the direct supervision of an adult who has in their possession an appropriate safety certificate issued by this state, or issued under the authority of another state.

(c) The person has in possession an appropriate safety certificate issued by this state or issued under the authority of another state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

38504.

No person under 14 years of age, on and after January 1, 1990, shall operate an all-terrain vehicle on public lands of this state unless the person satisfies one of the conditions set forth in Section 38503 and, in addition, is accompanied by and under the direct supervision of a parent or guardian or is accompanied by and under the direct supervision of an adult who is authorized by the parent or guardian.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

38504.1.

(a) Neither a parent or guardian of a child who is under 14 years of age, nor an adult who is authorized by the parent or guardian to supervise that child shall grant permission to, or knowingly allow, that child to operate an all-terrain vehicle in a manner that violates Section 38504.

(b) A person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) is punishable as follows:

(1) For a first conviction, the court shall
 either impose a fine of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) or order the person to take or retake and complete an all-terrain vehicle safety training course pursuant to Section 38501. If ordered to take or retake and complete the safety training course, the person shall provide the court a copy of the all-terrain vehicles safety certificate issued as a result of that completion.

(2) For a second conviction, a fine of not less than one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(3) For a third or any subsequent conviction, a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 195, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

38504.2.

If a person under 14 years of age was not properly supervised or accompanied in accordance with Section 38504, and the parent or guardian of that child or the adult who was authorized by the parent or guardian to supervise or accompany that child is in violation of Section 38504.1, upon a conviction pursuant to Section 38504, the court may order that child to attend and complete the all-terrain vehicle safety training course accompanied by the person who violated Section 38504.1. If so ordered, the child under 14 years of age shall provide the court a copy of the
 all-terrain vehicles safety certificate issued as a result of that completion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 195, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

38505.

A person, on and after January 1, 1989, shall not operate, ride, or be otherwise propelled on an all-terrain vehicle on public lands, as described in Section 38001, unless the person wears a safety helmet meeting requirements established for motorcycles and motorized bicycles, pursuant to Section 27802.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 469, Sec. 10.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

38506.

An operator of an all-terrain vehicle shall not carry a passenger when operating on public lands, as described in Section 38001.

However, the operator of an all-terrain vehicle, that is designed for operation off of the highway by an operator with no more than one passenger, may carry a passenger when operating on public lands, as described in Section 38001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 469, Sec. 11.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Recreational Off-Highway Vehicles [38600. - 38604.]

38600.

A person operating a recreational off-highway vehicle on lands, as described in Section 38001, shall be at least 16 years of age, or be directly supervised in the vehicle by a parent or guardian or by an adult authorized by the parent or guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 469, Sec. 12.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

38601.

A person shall not operate, or allow a passenger in, a recreational off-highway vehicle on public lands, as described in Section 38001, unless the person and the passenger are wearing safety helmets meeting the requirements established for motorcycles and motorized bicycles pursuant to Section 27802.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 469, Sec. 13.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

38602.

A person operating, and any passenger in, a recreational off-highway vehicle on lands, as described in Section 38001, shall wear a seatbelt and shoulder belt or safety harness that is properly fastened when the vehicle is in motion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 469, Sec. 14.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

38603.

(a) A person operating a recreational off-highway vehicle with a model year of 2014 or later on lands, as described in Section 38001, shall not allow a passenger to occupy a separate seat location not designed and provided by the manufacturer for a passenger.

(b) Seats that are installed in a separate seat location not designed and provided by the manufacturer for a passenger in a vehicle with a model year of 2013 or earlier on lands, as described in Section 38001, may be occupied by a passenger if the occupant of the seat is fully contained inside of the vehicle’s rollover protection structure at all times while the vehicle is being operated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 469, Sec. 15.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

38604.

(a) A person operating a recreational off-highway vehicle on lands, as described in Section 38001, shall not ride with a passenger, unless the passenger, while seated upright with their back against the seatback, can grasp the occupant handhold with the seatbelt and shoulder belt or safety harness properly fastened.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “occupant handhold” means any factory or aftermarket device grasped by an occupant to provide support and to assist in keeping arms and hands within the recreational off-highway vehicle. The steering wheel shall be considered an occupant handhold for the recreational off-highway vehicle operator.

(c) Occupant handholds shall be designed to allow the
 recreational off-highway vehicle passenger to exit the vehicle without interference from the handholds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 469, Sec. 16.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 16.6. AUTONOMOUS VEHICLES [38750. - 38755.]

38750.

(a) For purposes of this division, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Autonomous technology” means technology that has the capability to drive a vehicle without the active physical control or monitoring by a human operator.

(2) (A) “Autonomous vehicle” means any vehicle equipped with autonomous technology that has been integrated into that vehicle that meets the definition of Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 of SAE International’s “Taxonomy and Definitions for Terms Related to Driving Automation Systems for On-Road Motor Vehicles, standard J3016 (APR2021),” as may be revised.

(B) An autonomous vehicle does not include a vehicle that is equipped with one or more collision avoidance systems, including, but not limited to, electronic blind spot assistance, automated emergency braking systems, park assist, adaptive cruise control, lane keep assist, lane departure warning, traffic jam and queuing assist, or other similar systems that enhance safety or provide driver assistance, but are not capable, collectively or singularly, of driving the vehicle without the active control or monitoring of a human operator.

(3) “Department” means the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(4) An “operator” of an autonomous vehicle is the person who is seated in the driver’s seat, or, if there is no person in the driver’s seat,
 causes the autonomous technology to engage.

(5) A “manufacturer” of autonomous technology is the person, as defined in Section 470, that originally manufactures a vehicle and equips autonomous technology on the originally completed vehicle or, in the case of a vehicle not originally equipped with autonomous technology by the vehicle manufacturer, the person that modifies the vehicle by installing autonomous technology to convert it to an autonomous vehicle after the vehicle was originally manufactured.

(b) An autonomous vehicle may be operated on public roads for testing purposes by a driver who possesses the proper class of license for the type of vehicle being operated if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The
 autonomous vehicle is being operated on roads in this state solely by employees, contractors, or other persons designated by the manufacturer of the autonomous technology.

(2) The driver shall be seated in the driver’s seat, monitoring the safe operation of the autonomous vehicle, and capable of taking over immediate manual control of the autonomous vehicle in the event of an autonomous technology failure or other emergency.

(3) Prior to the start of testing in this state, the manufacturer performing the testing shall obtain an instrument of insurance, surety bond, or proof of self-insurance in the amount of five million dollars ($5,000,000), and shall provide evidence of the insurance, surety bond, or self-insurance to the department in the form and manner required by the department pursuant
 to the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (d).

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b), an autonomous vehicle shall not be operated on public roads until the manufacturer submits an application to the department, and that application is approved by the department pursuant to the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (d). The application shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following certifications:

(1) A certification by the manufacturer that the autonomous technology satisfies all of the following requirements:

(A) The autonomous vehicle has a mechanism to engage and disengage the autonomous technology that is easily accessible to the operator.

(B) The autonomous vehicle has a visual indicator inside the cabin to indicate when the autonomous technology is engaged.

(C) The autonomous vehicle has a system to safely alert the operator if an autonomous technology failure is detected while the autonomous technology is engaged, and when an alert is given, the system shall do either of the following:

(i) Require the operator to take control of the autonomous vehicle.

(ii) If the operator does not or is unable to take control of the autonomous vehicle, the autonomous vehicle shall be capable of coming to a complete stop.

(D) The autonomous vehicle shall allow the operator to take control in
 multiple manners, including, without limitation, through the use of the brake, the accelerator pedal, or the steering wheel, and it shall alert the operator that the autonomous technology has been disengaged.

(E) The autonomous vehicle’s autonomous technology meets Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards for the vehicle’s model year and all other applicable safety standards and performance requirements set forth in state and federal law and the regulations promulgated pursuant to those laws.

(F) The autonomous technology does not make inoperative any Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards for the vehicle’s model year and all other applicable safety standards and performance requirements set forth in state and federal law and the regulations promulgated pursuant to those laws.

(G) The autonomous vehicle has a separate mechanism, in addition to, and separate from, any other mechanism required by law, to capture and store the autonomous technology sensor data for at least 30 seconds before a collision occurs between the autonomous vehicle and another vehicle, object, or natural person while the vehicle is operating in autonomous mode. The autonomous technology sensor data shall be captured and stored in a read-only format by the mechanism so that the data is retained until extracted from the mechanism by an external device capable of downloading and storing the data. The data shall be preserved for three years after the date of the collision.

(2) A certification that the manufacturer has tested the autonomous technology on public roads and has complied
 with the testing standards, if any, established by the department pursuant to subdivision (d).

(3) A certification that the manufacturer will maintain, an instrument of insurance, a surety bond, or proof of self-insurance as specified in regulations adopted by the department pursuant to subdivision (d), in an amount of five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(d) (1) The department shall adopt regulations setting forth requirements for the submission of evidence of insurance, surety bond, or self-insurance required by subdivision (b), the submission and approval of an application to operate an autonomous vehicle pursuant to subdivision (c), and processes related to notices of autonomous vehicle noncompliance pursuant to Section 38752.

(2) The regulations shall include any testing, equipment, and performance standards, in addition to those established for purposes of subdivision (b), that the department concludes are necessary to ensure the safe operation of autonomous vehicles on public roads, with or without the presence of a driver inside the vehicle. In developing these regulations, the department may consult with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Institute of Transportation Studies at the University of California, or any other entity identified by the department that has expertise in automotive technology, automotive safety, and autonomous system design.

(3) The department may establish additional requirements by the adoption of regulations, which it determines, in consultation with the
 Department of the California Highway Patrol, are necessary to ensure the safe operation of autonomous vehicles on public roads, including, but not limited to, regulations regarding the aggregate number of deployments of autonomous vehicles on public roads, special rules for the registration of autonomous vehicles, new license requirements for operators of autonomous vehicles, regulations for notices of autonomous vehicle noncompliance, and rules for revocation, suspension, or denial of any license or any approval issued pursuant to this division.

(4) The department shall hold public hearings on the adoption of any regulation applicable to the operation of an autonomous vehicle without the presence of a driver inside the vehicle.

(e) (1) The department shall approve
 an application submitted by a manufacturer pursuant to subdivision (c) if it finds that the applicant has submitted all information and completed testing necessary to satisfy the department that the autonomous vehicles are safe to operate on public roads and the applicant has complied with all requirements specified in the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the application seeks approval for autonomous vehicles capable of operating without the presence of a driver inside the vehicle, the department may impose additional requirements it deems necessary to ensure the safe operation of those vehicles, and may require the presence of a driver in the driver’s seat of the vehicle if it determines, based on its review pursuant to paragraph (1), that such a requirement is necessary
 to ensure the safe operation of those vehicles on public roads.

(f) The department shall post a public notice on its internet website when it adopts the regulations required by subdivision (d). The department shall not approve an application submitted pursuant to the regulations until 30 days after the public notice is provided.

(g) Federal regulations promulgated by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration shall supersede the provisions of this division when found to be in conflict with any other state law or regulation.

(h) The manufacturer of the autonomous technology installed on a vehicle shall provide a written disclosure to the purchaser of an autonomous vehicle that describes what information is collected by
 the autonomous technology equipped on the vehicle. The department may promulgate regulations to assess a fee upon a manufacturer that submits an application pursuant to subdivision (c) to operate autonomous vehicles on public roads in an amount
 necessary to recover all costs reasonably incurred by the department.

(i) Commencing January 1, 2026, an autonomous vehicle may be equipped with automated driving system (ADS) marker lamps in accordance with SAE International’s “Recommended Practice, Automated Driving System (ADS) Marker Lamp, standard J3134 (MAY2019),” as may be revised, and SAE International’s “Chromaticity Requirements for Ground Vehicle Lamps and Lighting Equipment, standard J578 (APR2020),” as may be revised. For purposes of this subdivision, an “ADS marker lamp” means a device that emits a light to indicate when an ADS is engaged in the operation of the vehicle.

(j) (1) Commencing January 1, 2030, to the extent authorized by federal law, any autonomous vehicle with a
 model year of 2031 or later and a gross vehicle weight rating of less than 8,501 pounds shall only be operated pursuant to a deployment permit pursuant to Article 3.8 (commencing with Section 228.00) of Chapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations if the vehicle is a zero-emission vehicle, as defined in Section 44258 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The department shall not commence rulemaking for the adoption of regulations implementing this subdivision before January 1, 2027.
